Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Chapter 6

Commercial Feed Law

44-6-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Commercial Feed Law of 1972.”

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1118.

Cross-References. Commercial feed lot proprietors' and operators' lien, §66-20-106.

Exemption of livestock and poultry feeds from sales and use taxes, §67-6-329.

Comparative Legislation. Commercial feed:

Ala. Code §2-21-16 et seq.

Ark. Code §2-37-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §2-13-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 250.491 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §75-45-151 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 266.152 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-284.30 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-828.1 et seq.

Collateral References. 3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 56 et seq.

Agriculture
2.

44-6-102. Administration by commissioner of agriculture.

This chapter shall be administered by the commissioner of agriculture.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 2; T.C.A., § 44-1119.

44-6-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Brand name” means any word, name, symbol, or device, or any combination thereof, identifying the commercial feed of a distributor or registrant and distinguishing it from that of others;

“Commercial feed” means all materials except unmixed seed, whole and unprocessed, when not adulterated within the meaning of this chapter, that are offered for sale as feed or mixing for feed; provided, that the commissioner by regulation may exempt from this definition, or from specific provisions of this chapter, commodities such as hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, hulls, hemp, as defined in § 43-27-101, and individual compounds or substances, when those commodities, compounds, or substances are not intermixed or mixed with other materials and, except for hemp, are not adulterated within the meaning of this chapter;

“Commercial feed facility” or “licensed commercial feed facility” means a facility that manufactures or distributes commercial feed in this state and that is subject to licensure pursuant to this chapter;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture, or the commissioner's authorized agent;

“Contract feeder” means a person who, as an independent contractor, feeds commercial feed to animals pursuant to a contract, whereby the commercial feed is supplied, furnished, or otherwise provided to the person and whereby the person's remuneration is determined all or in part by feed, consumption, mortality, profits, or amount or quality of product;

“Customer-formula feed” means commercial feed that consists of a mixture of two (2) or more commercial feeds or a mixture of one (1) or more commercial feeds and one (1) or more feed ingredients or a mixture of two (2) or more feed ingredients, each batch of which is manufactured according to the specific instructions of the final purchaser;

“Distribute” means to offer for sale, sell, exchange, or barter commercial feed or customer-formula feed;

“Distributor” means any person who distributes;

“Drug” means any article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in animals other than humans, and articles other than feed intended to affect the structure or function of any part of the animal body;

“Feed ingredient” means each of the constituent materials making up a commercial feed;

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon or affixed to the container in which a commercial feed is distributed, or on the invoice or delivery slip with which a commercial feed is distributed;

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter:

Upon commercial feed or any of its containers or wrapper; or

Accompanying commercial feed;

“Manufacture” means to grind, mix or blend, or further process a commercial feed for distribution;

“Mineral feed” means a commercial feed intended to supply primarily mineral elements or inorganic nutrients;

“Official sample” means a sample of feed taken by the commissioner or the commissioner's agent in accordance with § 44-6-111(c), (e) or (f);

“Percent” or “percentage” means percentage by weight;

“Person” includes individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity;

“Pet” means any domesticated animal normally maintained in or near the household of its owner;

“Pet food” means any commercial feed prepared and distributed for consumption by pets;

“Product name” means the name of the commercial feed that identifies it as to kind, class, or specific use;

“Quantity statement” means the net weight (mass), net volume (liquid or dry) or count;

“Specialty pet” means any domesticated animal pet normally maintained in a cage or tank, such as, but not limited to, gerbils, hamsters, canaries, psittacines, birds, mynahs, finches, tropical fish, goldfish, snakes and turtles;

“Specialty pet food” means any commercial feed prepared and distributed for consumption by specialty pets; and

“Ton” means a net weight of two thousand pounds (2,000 lbs.) avoirdupois.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 3; T.C.A., § 44-1120; Acts 1997, ch. 55, §§ 1, 9-11; 2018, ch. 673, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 87, §§ 9, 10.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in the definition of “commercial feed”, inserted “, industrial hemps,” and substituted “with other materials and, except for industrial hemp,” for “with other materials, and”; and added the definition of “industrial hemp”.

The 2019 amendment, in the definition of “commercial feed”, substituted “hemp, as defined in §43-27-101” for “industrial hemps”, and substituted “except for hemp” for “except for industrial hemp”; and deleted the former definition of “industrial hemp” which read: “ ‘Industrial hemp’ has the same meaning as defined in §43-26-102;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 673, § 3. April 12, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 87, § 13. April 4, 2019.

44-6-104. License requirement — Application — Fees — Refusal of license — Hearing.

Any person who manufactures a commercial feed within the state, who distributes a commercial feed in or into the state, or whose name appears on the label of a commercial feed as guarantor shall obtain a license for each facility from which commercial feed is distributed in or into the state, authorizing the person to manufacture or distribute commercial feed before engaging in the activity. Any person who makes only retail sales of commercial feed that bears labeling or other approved indication that the commercial feed is from a licensed manufacturer, guarantor, or distributor is not required to obtain a license.

Any person who is required to obtain a license shall submit an application on a form provided by or approved by the commissioner, accompanied by payment in the amount set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703 for each facility. Each license shall expire on July 1 of the year for which it is issued.

The form and content of the commercial feed license application shall be established by rules promulgated by the commissioner.

The commissioner is empowered to refuse to issue a license to any person not in compliance with this chapter and to cancel the license of any licensee subsequently found not to be in compliance with any provision of this chapter; provided, that no license shall be refused or canceled unless the applicant or licensee has been given an opportunity to be heard before the commissioner and to amend the applicant's or licensee's application in order to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 4; T.C.A., § 44-1121; Acts 1997, ch. 55, § 2; 2015, ch. 485, § 16.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) Any person:“(1) Who manufactures a commercial feed within the state; or“(2) Who distributes a commercial feed in or into the state; or“(3) Whose name appears on the label of a commercial feed as guarantor“shall obtain a license for each facility from which commercial feed is distributed in or into the state authorizing the person to manufacture or distribute commercial feed before engaging in such activity. Any person who makes only retail sales of commercial feed that bears labeling or other approved indication that the commercial feed is from a licensed manufacturer, guarantor, or distributor who has assumed full responsibility for the tonnage inspection fee due under this chapter is not required to obtain a license.“(b) Any person who is required to obtain a license shall submit an application on a form provided or approved by the commissioner, accompanied by a license fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per facility to be paid to the commissioner. The license fee shall be applied to any inspection fees imposed pursuant to §44-6-109. The license year shall be the calendar year. Each license shall expire on December 31 of the year for which it is issued; provided, that any license shall be valid through February of the next ensuing year or until the issuance of the renewal license, whichever event first occurs, if the holder thereof has filed a renewal application with the commissioner on or before December 31 of the year for which the current license was issued. Any new applicant who fails to obtain a license within fifteen (15) working days of notification of the requirement to obtain a license, or any licensee who fails to comply with license renewal requirements, shall pay a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) late fee in addition to the license fee.“(c) The form and content of the commercial feed license application shall be established by rules promulgated by the commissioner.“(d) The commissioner may request from a license applicant or licensee, at any time, copies of labels and labeling in order to determine compliance with this section.“(e) The commissioner is empowered to refuse to issue a license to any person not in compliance with this chapter and to cancel the license of any licensee subsequently found not to be in compliance with any provisions of this chapter; provided, that no license shall be refused or cancelled unless the applicant or licensee has been given an opportunity to be heard before the commissioner and to amend the applicant's or licensee's application in order to comply with the requirements of this chapter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

44-6-105. Labeling.

A commercial feed shall be labeled as follows:

In case of a commercial feed, except a customer-formula feed, it shall be accompanied by a label bearing the following information:

The quantity statement;

The product name and the brand name, if any, under which the commercial feed is distributed;

The guaranteed analysis stated in such terms, as the commissioner by regulation determines, is required to advise the user of the composition of the feed or to support claims made in the labeling. In all cases the substances or elements must be determinable by laboratory methods published by the AOAC International, or other methods approved by regulation;

The common or usual name of each ingredient used in the manufacture of the commercial feed; provided, that the commissioner by regulation may permit the use of a collective term for a group of ingredients that perform a similar function, or the commissioner may exempt commercial feeds, or any group thereof, from this requirement of an ingredient statement if the commissioner finds that this statement is not required in the interest of consumers;

The name and principal mailing address of the manufacturer or the person responsible for distributing the commercial feed;

For those commercial feeds containing drugs, and for such other feeds as the commissioner may require by regulation, adequate directions for their safe and effective use; and

Such precautionary statements as the commissioner by regulation determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the commercial feed; and

In the case of a customer-formula feed, it shall be accompanied by a label, invoice, delivery slip, or other shipping document, bearing the following information:

Name and address of the manufacturer;

Name and address of the purchaser;

Date of delivery;

The product name and brand name, if any, and the net weight of each registered commercial feed used in the mixture, and the net weight of each other ingredient used;

For those customer-formula feeds containing drugs, and for such other feeds as the commissioner may require by regulation, adequate directions for their safe and effective use; and

Such precautionary statements as the commissioner by regulation determines are necessary for the safe and effective use of the customer-formula feed.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 5; T.C.A., § 44-1122; Acts 1997, ch. 55, §§ 3, 4.

44-6-106. Misbranding.

A commercial feed shall be deemed to be misbranded if:

Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

It is distributed under the name of another commercial feed;

It is not labeled as required in § 44-6-105;

It purports to be or is represented as a commercial feed, or if it purports to contain or is represented as containing a commercial feed ingredient, unless the commercial feed or feed ingredient conforms to the definition, if any, prescribed by regulation by the commissioner; or

Any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 6; T.C.A., § 44-1123.

44-6-107. Adulteration.

A commercial feed shall be deemed to be adulterated if:

It bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance, the commercial feed shall not be considered adulterated under this subdivision (1)(A), if the quantity of the substance in the commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;

It bears or contains any added poisonous, added deleterious, or added nonnutritive substance that is unsafe within the meaning of § 406 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, other than one that is:

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; or

A food additive;

It is, or it bears or contains any food additive that is unsafe within the meaning of § 409 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

It is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical that is unsafe within the meaning of § 408(a) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; provided, that where a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or a tolerance prescribed under § 408 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, and the raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing, such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the residue of the pesticide chemical remaining in or on the processed feed shall not be deemed unsafe if the residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice and the concentration of the residue in the processed feed is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity, unless the feeding of such processed feed will result or is likely to result in a pesticide residue in the edible product of the animal that is unsafe within the meaning of § 408(a) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

It is, or it bears or contains any color additive that is unsafe within the meaning of § 706 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

It is, or it bears or contains any new animal drug that is unsafe within the meaning of § 512 of the federal Food, Drug & Cosmetic Act;

It consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for feed;

It has been prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;

It is, in whole or in part, the product of a diseased animal or of an animal that has died otherwise than by slaughter that is unsafe within the meaning of § 402 (a)(1) or (2) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

Its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health; or

It has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with the regulations or exemptions in effect pursuant to § 409 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

Any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted therefrom or any less valuable substance substituted therefor;

Its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported or is represented to possess by its labeling;

It contains a drug and the methods used in or the facilities or controls used for its manufacture, processing, or packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing practice regulations promulgated by the commissioner to assure that the drug meets the requirements of this chapter as to safety and has the identity and strength and meets the quality and purity characteristics that it purports or is represented to possess. In promulgating such regulations, the commissioner shall adopt the current good manufacturing practice regulations for Type A Medicated Articles and Type B and Type C Medicated Feeds established under authority of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, unless the commissioner determines that they are not appropriate to the conditions that exist in this state; or

It contains viable weed seeds in amounts exceeding the limits that the commissioner establishes by rule or regulation.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 7; T.C.A., § 44-1124; Acts 1997, ch. 55, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. The federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, referred to in this section, is codified in 21 U.S.C. §§ 301-392. Sections 402, 406, 408, 409 and 512 of that act are codified at 21 U.S.C. §§ 342, 346, 346a, 348 and 360b, respectively; former § 706 of that act was redesignated as § 721 of the act in 1992 and is now codified at 21 U.S.C. § 379e.

44-6-108. Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing of the following acts within this state are prohibited:

The manufacture or distribution of any commercial feed that is adulterated or misbranded;

The adulteration or misbranding of any commercial feed;

The distribution of agricultural commodities, such as whole seed, hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, and hulls, that are adulterated within the meaning of § 44-6-107(1);

The removal or disposal of a commercial feed in violation of an order under § 44-6-112;

The failure or refusal to register in accordance with § 44-6-104; and

Failure to pay inspection fees and file reports as required by former § 44-6-109 [repealed].

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 8; T.C.A., § 44-1125.

Compiler's Notes. Section 44-6-109, referred to in (6), was repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 17, effective July 1, 2015.

44-6-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 9; T.C.A., § 44-1126; Acts 1980, ch. 538, § 1; 1997, ch. 55, § 7; 2008, ch. 787, § 1; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 17, effective July 1, 2015.

Compiler's Note. Former §44-6-109 concerned inspection fees; condition for license; reports.

44-6-110. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations for commercial feeds and pet foods as are specifically authorized in this chapter, and such other reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary for the efficient enforcement of this chapter. In the interest of uniformity, the commissioner shall by regulation adopt, unless the commissioner determines that they are inconsistent with this chapter or are not appropriate to conditions that exist in this state, the following:

The official definitions of feed ingredients and official feed terms adopted by the Association of American Feed Control Officials and published in the official publication of that organization; and

Any regulation promulgated pursuant to the authority of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.).

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 10; T.C.A., § 44-1127.

44-6-111. Inspection — Sampling — Analysis.

For the purpose of enforcement of this chapter, and in order to determine whether its provisions have been complied with, including whether or not any operations may be subject to the provisions, officers or employees duly designated by the commissioner, upon presenting appropriate credentials, are authorized to:

Enter, during normal business hours, any factory, warehouse, or establishment within the state in which commercial feeds are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for distribution, or to enter any vehicle being used to transport or hold commercial feeds; and

Inspect at reasonable times and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, such a factory, warehouse, establishment, or vehicle, and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers, and labeling therein.

The inspection may include the verification of only such records and production and control procedures as may be necessary to determine compliance with the good manufacturing practice regulations established under § 44-6-107(4).

A separate notice shall be given for each such inspection, but a notice shall not be required for each entry made during the period covered by the inspection. Each such inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness. Upon completion of the inspection, the person in charge of the facility or vehicle shall be so notified.

If the officer or employee making such an inspection of a factory, warehouse, or other establishment has obtained a sample in the course of the inspection, upon completion of the inspection and prior to leaving the premises, the officer or employee shall give to the owner, operator, or agent in charge a receipt describing the samples obtained.

If the owner of any factory, warehouse, or establishment described in subsection (a), or the owner's agent, refuses to admit the commissioner, or the commissioner's agent, to inspect in accordance with subsections (a) and (b), the commissioner is authorized to obtain from any state court a court order directing the owner or the owner's agent to submit the premises described in the warrant to inspection.

For the purpose of the enforcement of this chapter, the commissioner or the commissioner's duly designated agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises, including any vehicle of transport, during regular business hours to have access to, to obtain samples of, and to examine records relating to distribution of, commercial feeds.

Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods published by the AOAC International, or in accordance with other generally recognized methods.

The results of all analyses of official samples shall be forwarded by the commissioner to the person named on the label. When the inspection and analysis of an official sample indicate a commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded, the commissioner shall furnish to the registrant a portion of the sample concerned if the registrant requests it within thirty (30) days of notification.

The commissioner, in determining for administrative purposes whether a commercial feed is deficient in any component, shall be guided by the official sample as defined in § 44-6-103 and obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsections (c), (e), and (f).

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 11; T.C.A., § 44-1128; Acts 1997, ch. 55, § 8.

44-6-112. Withdrawal, condemnation and confiscation orders.

When the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agent has reasonable cause to believe any lot of commercial feed is being distributed in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any of the prescribed regulations under this chapter, the commissioner or the commissioner's agent may issue and enforce a written or printed “withdrawal from distribution” order, warning the distributor not to dispose of the lot of commercial feed in any manner until written permission is given by the commissioner or the court. The commissioner shall release the lot of commercial feed so withdrawn when the provisions and regulations have been complied with. If compliance is not obtained within thirty (30) days, the commissioner may begin, or upon request of the distributor or registrant shall begin, proceedings for condemnation.

Any lot of commercial feed not in compliance with any of the provisions of this chapter or of any of the prescribed regulations under this chapter shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the commissioner to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the commercial feed is located. In the event the court finds the commercial feed to be in violation of this chapter and orders the condemnation of the commercial feed, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial feed and the laws of the state; provided, that in no instance shall the disposition of the commercial feed be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial feed or for permission to process or relabel the commercial feed to bring it into compliance with this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 12; T.C.A., § 44-1129.

44-6-113. Violation a misdemeanor — Penalties — Construction — Injunction — Judicial review.

Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or who impedes, hinders or otherwise prevents, or attempts to prevent, the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent in performance of that official's duty in connection with this chapter commits a Class C misdemeanor. In all prosecutions under this chapter involving the composition of a lot of commercial feed, a certified copy of the official analysis signed by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agent shall be accepted as prima facie evidence of the composition.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the commissioner or the commissioner's representative to:

Report for prosecution;

Institute seizure proceedings; or

Issue a withdrawal from distribution order,

as a result of minor violations of this chapter, or when that official believes the public interest will best be served by suitable notice of warning in writing.

The commissioner is authorized to apply for, and the court to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. The injunction is to be issued without bond.

Any person adversely affected by an act, order or ruling made pursuant to this chapter may within forty-five (45) days thereafter bring action in the chancery court of Davidson County, or the chancery court in the county of the residence or principal place of business of the party adversely affected, for judicial review of the act, order or ruling. The form of the proceeding shall be any that may be provided by statutes of this state to review decisions of administrative agencies, or in the absence or inadequacy thereof, any applicable form of legal action, including actions for declaratory judgments or writs of prohibitory or mandatory injunctions.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 13; T.C.A., § 44-1130; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. Subsection (d) of this section is superseded by §4-5-322(b) to the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between this subsection and §4-5-322(b). See §4-5-103.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

44-6-114. Cooperation with other entities.

The commissioner may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government, and private associations in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 14; T.C.A., § 44-1131.

44-6-115. Publications.

The commissioner shall publish at least annually, in such forms as the commissioner may deem proper, information concerning the sales of commercial feeds, together with such data on their production and use as the commissioner may consider advisable, and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feeds sold within the state as compared with the analyses guaranteed in the registration and on the label; provided, that the information concerning production and use of commercial feed shall not disclose the operations of any single person or company.

Acts 1972, ch. 488, § 15; T.C.A., § 44-1132.